Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-907
Power plant; transmission lines; right-of-way.

A city of the second class or village is hereby given, for the purpose of erecting and operating a power plant, electric or other light works as provided in section 17-906, a right-of-way over and the right to erect and maintain transmission lines upon, within, and across any of the public highways of the state, subject to sections 75-709 to 75-724.

Laws 1921, c. 192, § 1, p. 711;

C.S.1922, § 4394;

C.S.1929, § 17-601;

R.S.1943, § 17-907;

Laws 1992, LB 866, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 243.